Vermont, session 2025-2026, H785.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) according to the Alzheimer Association’s 2025 Vermont
Alzheimer’s Statistics, there are:
(A) 12,800 Vermonters over 65 years of age with Alzheimer’s
Disease; and
VT LEG #385851 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.785
2026 Page 2 of 4
(B) 20,000 unpaid caregivers in Vermont providing a combined total
of 29 million hours of care annually, which totals $773,000,000.00 in unpaid
care, 61.5 percent of whom have chronic health conditions themselves and
35.4 percent of whom have depression;
(2) according to the Department of Health, one in four caregivers spend
40 or more hours per week on dementia-related caregiving responsibilities;
(3) according to the Alzheimer’s Association’s 2021 Behavioral Risk
Factor Surveillance System, 71.1 percent of Vermont’s dementia caregivers are
women, 23.6 percent of Vermont’s dementia caregivers are also caring for a
child, and 52.8 percent of Vermont’s dementia caregivers have been providing
care for two or more years;
(4) according to the Alzheimer’s Association, 57 percent of employed
dementia caregivers had to go into work late, leave early, or take time off due
to caregiving demands;
(5) according to the Alzheimer’s Association, the total lifetime cost of
care for a person living with dementia is approximately $405,262.00; and
(6) Vermont’s Dementia Respite Grant is distributed by the Department
of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living to the five area agencies on
aging to support unpaid family caregivers and may be used for services such as
in-home care and adult day services, but is not available to individuals
receiving Choices for Care or receiving caregiver support through the Veterans
VT LEG #385851 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.785
2026 Page 3 of 4
Independence, Attendant Services, or National Family Caregiver Support
programs.
Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION; DEMENTIA RESPITE GRANT PROGRAM
(a) In fiscal year 2027, $750,000.00 shall be appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living for
distribution to the Vermont Association of Area Agencies on Aging to fund the
Vermont Dementia Respite Grant.
(b) Twenty percent of the grant shall be used to fund “out-of-home day”
respite care, including adult day programs, meaning care provided in a group
setting outside the home during daytime hours.
(c) Individuals with dementia with an annual income at or below 400
percent of the federal poverty level shall be eligible for grant funds under this
section. Funds shall be capped at $3,000.00 per person for fiscal year 2027.
(d) Each area agency on aging shall maintain a waitlist for services funded
through this grant program. Funding shall be available on a first-come, first-
served basis.
Sec. 3. APPROPRIATION; DEMENTIA CAPABLE SOCIAL ACTIVITIES
(a) In fiscal year 2027, $100,000.00 shall be appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living to
establish a one-year pilot program to create or expand dementia capable social
activities in Rutland and Washington Counties. The grant shall be
VT LEG #385851 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.785
2026 Page 4 of 4
administered by the Department’s State Dementia Services Coordinator, in
consultation with the Commission on Alzheimer’s Disease and Related
Disorders established pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 3085b.
(b) The State Dementia Services Coordinator shall award four grants of
$25,000.00 to community organizations in Rutland and Washington Counties,
such as senior centers, libraries, recreation departments, and meal sites,
providing dementia capable social activities. The State Dementia Services
Coordinator shall prioritize activities serving individuals with cognitive
impairment or dementia and that support brain health. Successful grant
applicants shall have completed training in communicating with and
developing activities for individuals with dementia and other cognitive
disorders.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385851 v.1